Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2686.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "average wholesale price" in section 9002 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9002. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Average wholesale price." The average wholesale price of all taxable liquid fuels and fuels, excluding the Federal excise tax and all liquid fuels taxes, shall be as follows:[(1) After December 31, 2013, and before January 1, 2015, the average wholesale price shall be $1.87 per gallon.(2) After December 31, 2014, and before January 1, 2017, 12345678910111213141516171819 the average wholesale price shall be $2.49 per gallon.](3) After December 31, 2016, and before the effective date of paragraph (4), the average wholesale price shall be as determined by the Department of Revenue for the 12-month period ending on the September 30 immediately prior to January 1 of the year for which the rate is to be set. In no case shall the average wholesale price be less than $2.99 per gallon.(4) On or after the effective date of this paragraph, the average wholesale price shall be $1.87 per gallon.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to liquid fuels and fuels used or sold and distributed within this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2686PN3744 - 2 - 123456789101112131415